Maine, session 132, LD315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1, sub-§20-B is enacted to read:
20-B. Personal finance. "Personal finance" means a course of study including
instruction in the applications of money in areas such as saving, investing, banking and the
stock market.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §254, sub-§13, as amended by PL 2015, c. 64, §1, is further
amended to read:
13. Technical assistance; integrated model for instruction in personal finance.
The commissioner shall develop a program of technical assistance that promotes the
importance of financial literacy and encourages requires school administrative units to
implement an integrated model for instruction in personal finance that may must be used
in secondary schools as part of the instruction in social studies or mathematics required by
section 4722, subsection 2, paragraphs B and paragraph C. The commissioner, in
consultation with the Finance Authority of Maine, the Office of Securities within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Jobs for Maine's Graduates,
organizations representing banks, credit unions and financial professionals and other
interested organizations promoting personal finance initiatives, shall prepare and distribute
annually, in January, a report to school boards and superintendents that includes strategies
and resources available to implement an integrated model for instruction in personal
finance for use in secondary schools. The annual report must also be provided to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters, and the
department shall post the report on its publicly accessible website. The commissioner shall
identify best practices to support students' financial literacy for those school administrative
units that elect to offer financial literacy education pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. Social studies and history, including American history, government, and civics and
personal finance--2 years or the equivalent in standards achievement;
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 202, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. Mathematics, including one year of personal finance--2 3 years or the equivalent in
standards achievement;